District of Columbia statutes.
21-104

Termination of guardianship of the person.

A natural guardianship or an appointive guardianship of the person of an infant ceases when said infant becomes 18 years of age or marries.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 738, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
July 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-75, § 4(d), 23 DCR 1181
Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-107, title I, § 115, 23 DCR 8737
1973 Ed., § 21-104.
1981 Ed., § 21-104.